Ohio, session 136, HB204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.212 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5.212. The ninth day of March is designated as 6
"6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion Day" to honor those 7
who served in the 6888th central postal directory battalion, the 8
only all-Black women's unit to serve overseas during World War 9
II. 10